Wyoming, session 2025, SF0124.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-5-215, 7-2-109 and 9-25-101 through
9-25-105 are created to read:

6-5-215. Transportation or concealment of illegal
aliens.

(a) No person shall transport, move or attempt to
transport or move in the state of Wyoming any alien knowing
that the alien has come to, entered or remained in the
United States in violation of law, in furtherance of the
illegal presence of the alien in the United States.

(b) No person shall conceal, harbor or shelter from
detection any alien in any place within the state of
Wyoming, including any building or means of transportation,
knowing that the alien has come to, entered or remained in
the United States in violation of law.

SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
(c) Any person violating subsection (a) or (b) of
this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony
punishable by imprisonment of not more than five (5) years,
a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00),
or both.

7-2-109. Peace officers; citizenship status;
cooperation.

(a) Each peace officer detaining a person for the
issuance of a citation or the arrest of a person shall ask
the person regarding the person's immigration status or
lawful presence in the United States.

(b) No law enforcement agency in the state shall
adopt a policy, rule or procedure that prohibits peace
officers from asking about a person's immigration status.

(c) Upon determining that a person is an unauthorized
alien as defined by W.S. 9-25-101(a)(iv) or if the lawful
immigration or citizenship status of a person cannot be
verified after detaining or arresting the person, the peace
officer or the law enforcement agency shall notify the
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
United States department of homeland security or the United
States immigration and customs enforcement. Upon providing
notice under this subsection, the detaining law enforcement
agency shall continue to detain the person in accordance
with law until the United States department of homeland
security or the United States immigration and customs
enforcement assumes custody of the person or proof of the
person's lawful status in the country is provided.

CHAPTER 25
ILLEGAL IMMIGRATION

9-25-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Federal public benefit" means as defined by
8 U.S.C. § 1611(c);

(ii) "Local government" means cities, towns,
counties, school districts, joint powers boards, airport
boards, public corporations, entities formed by a county
memorial hospital, special hospital district, rural health
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
care district or senior health care district that are
wholly owned by one (1) or more governmental entities,
community college districts, special districts and their
governing bodies, all political subdivisions of the state,
and their agencies, instrumentalities and institutions;

(iii) "State or local public benefit" means as
defined by 8 U.S.C. § 1621(c);

(iv) "Unauthorized alien" means as defined by 8
U.S.C. § 1324a(h)(3).

9-25-102. Employer verification of employees;
reporting.

(a) Each employer in the state shall inquire as to a
potential employee's or contractor's immigration status
before commencing the person's employment or entering into
a contract with the person for the provision of services.

(b) Each employer that discovers or learns that a
person employed or contracted by the employer is an
unauthorized alien shall report the unauthorized alien's
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
status to state or local law enforcement, federal law
enforcement or the United States immigration and customs
enforcement.

9-25-103. Violations; penalties.

(a) Any person who knowingly hires, contracts with,
recruits or refers for a fee an unauthorized alien shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a
fine of not less than:

(i) Three hundred seventy-five dollars ($375.00)
and not more than three thousand two hundred dollars
($3,200.00) for the first offense;

(ii) Three thousand two hundred dollars
($3,200.00) and not more than six thousand five hundred
dollars ($6,500.00) for the second offense;

(iii) Four thousand three hundred dollars
($4,300.00) and not more than sixteen thousand dollars
($16,000.00) for the third or subsequent offense.

SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
(b) For purposes of subsection (a) of this section,
the hiring, contracting with, recruiting or referring of
each unauthorized alien shall be deemed a separate offense.

9-25-104. Public benefits.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (c) of this
section or federal law, each agency or local government of
this state shall verify the lawful presence in the United
States of any person age fourteen (14) or older who has
applied for a state or local public benefit or a federal
public benefit from a state agency or local government.

(b) This section shall be enforced without regard to
race, religion, gender, ethnicity or national origin.

(c) Verification of lawful presence under this
section shall not be required for:

(i) Any purpose if lawful presence in the United
States is not restricted by law, ordinance or regulation;

SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
(ii) Assistance for health care items and
services that are necessary for the treatment of an
emergency medical condition, as defined in 42 U.S.C. §
1396b(v)(3), if the items or services are not related to an
organ transplant procedure;

(iii) Short-term, noncash, in-kind emergency
disaster relief;

(iv) Public health assistance for immunizations
with respect to diseases and for testing and treatment of
symptoms of communicable diseases, whether or not the
symptoms are caused by a communicable disease; or

(v) Programs, services or assistance that:

(A) Deliver in-kind services at the
community level, including public or private nonprofit
agencies;

(B) Do not condition the provision of
assistance, amount of assistance or cost of assistance on
the income or resources of the recipient;
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387

(C) Are necessary for the protection of
life or safety.

(d) For verification of the lawful presence of an
applicant in the United States, the agency or local
government required to make the verification shall provide
notary public services at no cost to the applicant and
require that the applicant execute an affidavit under
penalty of perjury that the applicant is a:

(i) United States citizen; or

(ii) Qualified alien under the federal
Immigration and Nationality Act and is lawfully present in
the United States.

(e) For any applicant who has executed an affidavit
under paragraph (d)(ii) of this section, eligibility for
benefits shall be determined through the systematic alien
verification of entitlement program operated by the United
States department of homeland security or a successor
program. Until eligibility is verified, an affidavit
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
executed under subsection (d) of this section may be
presumed to be proof of lawful presence in the United
States for purposes of this section.

(f) Any person who knowingly makes a false or
fraudulent statement or representation in an affidavit
executed under subsection (d) of this section shall be
subject to criminal penalties under W.S. 6-5-303(a). If the
affidavit constitutes a false claim of United States
citizenship under 18 U.S.C. § 911, a complaint shall be
filed with the appropriate United States attorney by the
agency or local government that required the affidavit.

(g) An agency or local government may adopt
variations to the requirements of this section if the
agency or local government can demonstrate that the
variation improves the efficiency of or reduces any delay
in the verification process or to provide for the
adjudication of unique individual circumstances where the
verification procedures would impose undue hardship on a
legal resident of this state.

SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
(h) No agency or local government shall provide any
state or local public benefit or a federal public benefit
without first complying with the requirements of this
section.

(j) Not later than October 1 of each year, the
attorney general, the department of health, the department
of workforce services, the department of family services
and the department of administration and information shall
provide an annual report to the governor, the speaker of
the house, the president of the senate and management
council with respect to efforts for compliance with this
section. Each agency or local government subject to this
section shall monitor the systematic alien verification of
entitlement program for errors and significant delays. As
part of the report required under this subsection, each
agency specified in this subsection shall report any
recommendations that would help ensure that the systematic
alien verification of entitlement program is not
erroneously denying benefits to legal residents of Wyoming
or erroneously providing benefits to unauthorized aliens.
Any error discovered shall also be reported to the United
States department of homeland security.
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387

9-25-105. Memoranda of understanding; communication
of immigration status.

(a) The attorney general, with the approval of the
governor, is authorized and directed to negotiate the terms
of a memorandum of understanding between the state of
Wyoming and the United States department of justice or the
United States department of homeland security, as provided
by 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g), for the enforcement of federal
immigration and customs laws, detentions, removals and
investigations in Wyoming.

(b) The memorandum of understanding negotiated under
subsection (a) of this section shall be signed on behalf of
the state by the governor and the attorney general or as
otherwise required by the appropriate federal agency.

(c) Each county sheriff, in consultation with the
board of county commissioners, shall negotiate the terms of
a memorandum of understanding between the county and the
United States department of justice or the United States
department of homeland security, as provided by 8 U.S.C. §
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
1357(g), for the enforcement of federal immigration and
customs laws, detentions, removals and investigations in
Wyoming. The memorandum of understanding negotiated under
this subsection shall be signed by the board of county
commissioners and the sheriff or as otherwise required by
the appropriate federal agency.

(d) No local government, whether acting through its
governing body or by an initiative, referendum or any other
process, shall enact any ordinance or policy that limits or
prohibits a peace officer, local official or local
government employee from communicating or cooperating with
federal officials with regard to the immigration status of
any person within this state.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
government entity, agency or official or local government
shall prohibit or in any way restrict any employee or
official of the government entity, agency or local
government from sending to, or receiving from, the United
States department of homeland security or the United States
department of justice information regarding the citizenship
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
status, work authorization status or immigration status of
any person.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
person shall prohibit or in any way restrict a public
employee from doing any of the following with respect to
information regarding the citizenship, work authorization
or immigration status of any person:

(i) Sending information related to immigration
status, work authorization status or citizenship status to,
or requesting or receiving status information from, the
United States department of homeland security;

(ii) Maintaining information related to
citizenship, work authorization and immigration status;

(iii) Exchanging status information with any
other federal, state or local government entity.

(g) Any person lawfully residing and domiciled in
this state shall have a private right of action to file for
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
a writ of mandamus to compel any noncooperating state
agency or local government to comply with this chapter.

Section 2. W.S. 7-13-104, 31-7-111 by creating new
subsections (h) through (m) and 31-8-101(b) are amended to
read:

7-13-104. Record of prisoners; citizenship status.

(a) The department of corrections shall keep a
complete record of the background and current status of all
prisoners sentenced and confined in any state penal
institution. The administrator of the institution where a
prisoner is incarcerated, the division of criminal
investigation, and the clerk of court and sheriff of the
county from which the prisoner is committed shall, at the
request of the department or the board of parole, furnish
any information in their possession relating to the
prisoner or the offense committed.

(b) When a person charged with a felony or with
driving or having control of a vehicle while under the
influence under W.S. 31-5-233 is confined for any period in
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
a county jail or state penal institution, the department of
corrections or county sheriff, as applicable, shall make a
reasonable effort to determine the citizenship status of
the person. If verification of lawful status cannot be made
from documents in the person's possession, verification
shall be completed not later than forty-eight (48) hours of
the commencement of the person's confinement by making an
inquiry to the law enforcement support center of the United
States department of homeland security or other designated
federal agency. If the lawful immigration or citizenship
status of a person cannot be verified under this
subsection, the county sheriff or the department of
corrections shall notify the United States department of
homeland security.

31-7-111. Application for license or permit
generally.

(h) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (j) of
this section, no person shall be issued an instruction
permit, driver's license, commercial driver's license or
commercial learner's permit unless the person is a United
States citizen or a legal permanent resident alien.
SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387

(j) Subsection (h) of this section shall not apply if
an applicant presents, in person, valid documentary
evidence of at least one (1) of the following:

(i) An unexpired immigrant or nonimmigrant visa
status for admission into the United States;

(ii) A pending or approved application for
asylum in the United States;

(iii) Admission into the United States under
refugee status;

(iv) A pending or approved application for
temporary protected status in the United States;

(v) Approved deferred action status;

(vi) A pending application for adjustment of
status to legal permanent resident status or conditional
resident status.

SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
(k) If an applicant provides valid evidence under
subsection (j) of this section and notwithstanding any
other provision of law, a license or permit issued shall be
valid only during the time of the authorized stay of the
applicant in the United States or, if there is no definite
end to the period of authorized stay, a period of one (1)
year. A license or permit issued under this subsection:

(i) Shall clearly notate on the license or
permit that the license or permit is temporary, and the
date on which the license or permit will expire;

(ii) May be renewed only upon presentation of
valid documentary evidence that the status by which the
applicant qualified for the license or permit is still in
effect or has been extended by the appropriate federal
agency.

(m) Any renewal or replacement of an instruction
permit, driver's license, commercial driver's license or
commercial learner's permit shall be in accordance with
subsections (h) through (k) of this section.

SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
31-8-101. Issuance to residents by department;
restrictions; limited to one state-issued credential;
digital identification card; definitions; rulemaking.

(b) The department shall not issue an identification
card until valid documentary evidence of the applicant's
age and identity has been verified using documents as
provided by W.S. 31-7-111 and the applicant's citizenship
or immigration status has been verified under W.S.
31-7-111(h) through (m).

Section 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
alter, amend or impair any contract or agreement entered
into before July 1, 2025.

Section 4. The attorney general, the department of
transportation, the department of administration and
information, the department of health, the department of
corrections, the department of workforce services and the
department of family services shall promulgate all rules
necessary to implement this act.

SF0124

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0387
Section 5.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0124